Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.200

Administrative procedure act applicable.

The administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, shall wherever applicable govern the rights, remedies, and procedures respecting the administration of this chapter.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 208 s 21.]